Utah statutes.
48-3a-212.   Annual report for division.

(1)  A limited liability company or a registered foreign limited liability company shall deliver to the division for filing an annual report that states:

(a)  the name of the limited liability company or registered foreign limited liability company;

(b)  the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1);

(c)  the street and mailing addresses of its principal office;

(d)  the name of at least one governing person; and

(e)  in the case of a foreign limited liability company, its jurisdiction of formation and any alternate name adopted under Subsection 48-3a-906(1).

(2)  Information in the annual report must be current as of the date the report is signed by the limited liability company or registered foreign limited liability company.

(3)  A report must be delivered to the division for each year following the calendar year in which the limited liability company's certificate of organization became effective or the registered foreign limited liability company registered to do business in this state:

(a)  in the case of a limited liability company, the annual report must be delivered to the division during the month in which is the anniversary date on which the limited liability company's certificate of formation became effective; and

(b)  in the case of a registered foreign limited liability company, the annual report must be delivered to the division during the month in which is the anniversary date on which the registered foreign limited liability company registered to do business in this state.

(4)  If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the division promptly shall notify the reporting limited liability company or registered foreign limited liability company in a record and return the report for correction.

(5)  If an annual report contains the name or address of a registered agent which differs from the information shown in the records of the division immediately before the annual report becomes effective, the differing information in the annual report is considered a statement of change under Section 16-17-206.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

